apertium-frp.frp.metadix
<pardef n="lèss/iér__vblex" c="modèle 1ère conjugaison B">
  <e>       <p><l>iér</l>       <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ient</l>      <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iê</l>        <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ê</l>         <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iês</l>       <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ês</l>        <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iêe</l>       <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- ée préféré (Stich, 01.06.2020) -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>êe</l>        <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iêes</l>      <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>êes</l>       <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l>         <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>e<a/></l>     <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ons</l>       <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iéd</l>       <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>iéde</l>      <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ont</l>       <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>iêvo</l>      <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>iêva</l>      <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iêves</l>     <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iêve</l>      <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iêvens</l>    <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>iêvons</l>    <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iêvâd</l>     <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iêvont</l>    <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ieré</l>      <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ierés</l>     <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ierat</l>     <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ierens</l>    <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ierons</l>    <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ieréd</l>     <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ieront</l>    <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ierê</l>      <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ierên</l>     <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ierês</l>     <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ierêt</l>     <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ierans</l>    <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ierians</l>   <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ierâd</l>     <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ieriâd</l>    <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ierant</l>    <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ieriant</l>   <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ié</l>        <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>iéro</l>      <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iés</l>       <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>iéres</l>     <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iét</l>       <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>iat</l>       <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iens</l>      <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ions</l>      <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>iérens</l>    <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>iérons</l>    <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iéte</l>      <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>iérâd</l>     <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>iéréd</l>     <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iéront</l>    <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eyo</l>       <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eyes</l>      <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eye</l>       <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eyens</l>     <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ons</l>       <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eyons</l>     <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éd</l>        <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eyéd</l>      <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ont</l>       <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eyont</l>     <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>iéso</l>      <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>iésso</l>     <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iéses</l>     <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>iésses</l>    <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iése</l>      <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>iésse</l>     <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iésens</l>    <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>iésons</l>    <r>iér<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

<e lm="acovassiér">      <i>acovass</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="afétiér">         <i>afét</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="amorachiér">      <i>amorach</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="apèsiér">         <i>apès</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="atachiér">        <i>atach</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="baptiér">         <i>bapt</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="blessiér">        <i>bless</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bouchiér">        <i>bouch</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="brisiér">         <i>bris</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="brossiér">        <i>bross</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bèsiér">          <i>bès</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="carèssiér">       <i>carèss</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="chariér">         <i>char</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cicatrisiér">     <i>cicatris</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cllochiér">       <i>clloch</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="conchiér">        <i>conch</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="coviér">          <i>cov</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="crevassiér">      <i>crevass</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cuchiér">         <i>cuch</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dèbouchiér">      <i>dèbouch</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dècarcassiér">    <i>dècarcass</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dècouessiér">     <i>dècouess</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dècuchiér">       <i>dècuch</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dègoèsiér">       <i>dègoès</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dèlâssiér">       <i>dèlâss</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dèpachiér">       <i>dèpach</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dèshanchiér">     <i>dèshanch</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dètachiér">       <i>dètach</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="embrochiér">      <i>embroch</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="encochiér">       <i>encoch</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="engeniér">        <i>engen</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="enquèssiér">      <i>enquèss</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="entassiér">       <i>entass</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="escandalisiér">   <i>escandalis</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="formalisiér">     <i>formalis</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="frecassiér">      <i>frecass</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fuiriér">         <i>fuir</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fôssiér">         <i>fôss</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="gorlanchiér">     <i>gorlanch</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="grèssiér">        <i>grèss</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="hâchiér">         <i>hâch</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="hôssiér">         <i>hôss</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="louchiér">        <i>louch</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lèssiér">         <i>lèss</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="mèprisiér">       <i>mèpris</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pavouèsiér">      <i>pavouès</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pléssiér">        <i>pléss</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pèrchiér">        <i>pèrch</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rapèrchiér">      <i>rapèrch</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="remassiér">       <i>remass</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rognassiér">      <i>rognass</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rèvassiér">       <i>rèvass</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tamisiér">        <i>tamis</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tracassiér">      <i>tracass</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="trênassiér">      <i>trênass</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="vèssiér">         <i>vèss</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ècrapassiér">     <i>ècrapass</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ètanchiér">       <i>ètanch</i><par n="lèss/iér__vblex"/></e>
